Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1150 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Agricultural food animal" means any domesticated animal
belonging to the bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species, or any
domesticated chicken or turkey;
2. "Cultivated-protein food product" means a food product
having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue
originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of
being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing
cells or nonanimal sources, including processes in which one or more

stem cells are initially isolated from an agricultural food animal,
are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a
manufacturing operation;
3. "Identifying meat term" means any word or phrase that
states, indicates, suggests, or describes a meat product and
includes any:
a. common name for the species of the agricultural food
animal subject to slaughter and processing, including
calf, chicken, cow, goat, hog, kid, lamb, pig,
poultry, sheep, or turkey,
b. any characteristic of a species of the agricultural
food animal subject to slaughter and processing,
including beef, broiler, cabrito, chevon, fryer, lamb,
mutton, pork, poulet, veal, or yearling, and
c. common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of
an agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed,
including a major meat cut or any other common name
that a reasonable purchaser would immediately and
exclusively associate with a meat product prepared for
sale in normal commercial channels, including bacon,
bologna, bone, brat, bratwurst, brisket, burger, butt,
chop, chuck, cold cut, cutlet, filet, flat iron,
frank, frankfurter, ham, hamburger, hock, hot dog,
jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New
York strip, pepperoni, porterhouse, rib, ribeye,
roast, salami, sausage, shank, sirloin, sparerib,
tenderloin, or any comparable word or phrase;
4. "Insect-protein food product" means a food product having
one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue
originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of
being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing
insect parts;
5. "Manufactured-protein food product" means a cultivated
protein food product, insect-protein food product, or plant-protein
food product containing more than a trace amount of plant-protein
food products;
6. "Plant-protein food product" means a food product having one
or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue found in a
ENR. H. B. NO. 1126 Page 2

species of agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being
derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing plant
parts; and
7. "Qualifying term" means a word, compound word, or phrase
that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat
products that a food product is not a meat product including cell-
cultivated, cell-cultured, fake, grown in a lab, imitation, insect,
insect-based, insect protein, lab-created, lab-grown, meat-free,
meatless, plant, plant-based, vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie,
or any comparable word or phrase.
B. No person shall falsely advertise or misbrand any food or
distribute, offer for sale, or sell any misbranded food.
C. A food shall be deemed to be falsely advertised or
misbranded if:
1. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled
with an identifying meat term, such manufactured-protein food
product is not labeled with a conspicuous and prominent qualifying
term in close proximity to the identifying meat term; or
2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled
with an identifying meat term and offered for sale at a food
establishment, such manufactured-protein food product is not labeled
in a manner that is clearly and distinctly separate from any product
that is made from tissue originating from any agricultural food
animal.
D. A manufactured-protein food product is falsely advertised or
misbranded if:
1. All labeling or advertising for such manufactured-protein
food product that lists an identifying meat term does not include a
conspicuous and prominent qualifying term in close proximity to the
identifying meat term; or
2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is offered
for sale at a food establishment, such manufactured-protein food
product is not stored in a manner that:
a. keeps such product separate from tissue originating
from agricultural food animals, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1126 Page 3

b. uses distinctive shelf tags or other posted
representations to identify and distinguish such
manufactured-protein food product from tissue
originating from agricultural food animals.
E. The Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry shall
investigate all credible complaints that food products are falsely
advertised or misbranded as meat products.
F. Any person who violates the provisions of this act shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.
G. A manufacturer of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and
1-1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that violates this act
shall be subject to all enforcement measures as provided by rule of
the Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.
H. The Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry may adopt
rules as necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1126 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1126 Page 5